src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON 2CAACI_VYEHI_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** common Pl forms for Px 
+N: X_CAACI_VYEHI_PL ; 
+N+Pl+Gen:^WG^RVSH%>id CPXsuff ;    ! párnáidis ejijdis 
+N+Pl+Acc:^WG^RVSH%>id CPXsuff ;    ! párnáidis 
+N+Pl+Ill:^WG^RVSH%>id CPXsuff ;    ! párnáidis 
+N+Pl+Loc:^WG^RVSH%>in CPXsuff ;    ! ejijnis 
+N+Pl+Com:^WG^RVSH%>id CPXsuffCOM ; ! párnáidiskuin ejijdiskuin 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2CAACI_PL_DIM ;
 
LEXICON X_CAACI_VYEHI_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** common Sg case forms 
+Sg+Nom: K ;                  ! čääci 
+Sg+Gen:^WG K ;               ! čääsi 
+Sg+Acc:^WG K ;               ! čääsi 
+Sg+Ill:^EA^CSH%>n K ;        ! čáácán MLO prinsihpas: CSH haga 
+Sg+Loc:^WG%>st K ;           ! čääsist 
+Sg+Com:^WG^CLEN^RVSH%>in K ; ! čassijn 
+Sg+Abe:^WG^RVSH%>ttáá K ;    ! čäsittáá 
 
LEXICON X_CAACI_VYEHI_PL!!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Pl+Ill:^WG^CLEN^RVSH%>id K ; ! čassijd  
X_WG_RVSH_PL_notILL ; 
 

!! ### 2AIGI lexicon family 
 
LEXICON 2AIGI !!≈ * **@CODE@** similar to 2VADDU except from EA for Sg+Ill 
2AIGI_SG ; 
2AIGI_PL ; !2PUUVSAH_PL 
 
LEXICON X_AIGI !!≈ * **@CODE@** similar to 2VADDU except from EA for Sg+Ill 
X_AIGI_SG ; 
X_ALGA_PL ; 
 
LEXICON 2AIGI_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** ä^RVi4gi
+N: X_AIGI_SG ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ;            ! äigi 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> Rhash ;       ! äigi 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2AIGI_SG_DIM ; ! uábáš uábbi kiäđgáš uáiváš jáávráš suáhi > suáváš needs ^WG 

+N+Sg+Nom:^EA^CLEN VPXsuff12nom ;         ! áigám 
+N+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:^EX^CLEN VPXsuff12nom ;         ! áigám 
+N+Sg+Gen:^WG^EA VPXsuff12 ;    ! áigán pááihán 
+N+Sg+Acc:^WG^EA VPXsuff12 ;    ! 
+N+Sg+Nom:^CLEN VPXsuff3 ;      ! pääihis, ääigis 
+N+Sg+Gen:^WG^RLEN VPXsuff3 ;   ! ääigis 
+N+Sg+Acc:^WG^RLEN VPXsuff3 ;   ! ääigis 
+N+Sg+Com:^WG%>in CPXsuff ;     ! juolgijnân aigijnân enijnân 
+N+Sg+Ill:^EA%>s CPXsuff ;      ! páikkásis áigásis 
+N+Sg+Loc:^WG%>st CPXsuff ;     ! sajestis päihistis äigistis 
+N+Ess:%>n CPXsuff ;            ! äiginis 
 
LEXICON 2AIGI_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_ALGA_PL ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ;                  ! äigi 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:^WG^RLEN%>i Rhash ;       ! aašijaairâs 
+N+Pl+Gen:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;            ! párnáidis 
+N+Pl+Acc:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;            ! párnáidis 
+N+Pl+Ill:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;            ! párnáidis 
+N+Pl+Com:^WG^RVSH%>id CPXsuffCOM ;    ! párnáidiskuin koskijdânguin 
+N+Pl+Loc:^WG^CLEN^SVLOW%>in CPXsuff ; ! juolgijnân 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2AIGI_PL_DIM ;       ! uábáš uábbi kiäđgáš uáiváš jáávráš suáhi > suáváš needs ^WG 

 
LEXICON X_AIGI_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Sg+Nom: K ;                         ! äigi eeč^RCi 
+Sg+Gen:^WG^RLEN K ;                 ! ääigi 
+Sg+Acc:^WG^RLEN K ;                 ! ääigi 
+Sg+Ill:^EA^CSH^RLEN%>n K ;          ! ááigán! DIFTONGISATION 
+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:^EX^CSH^RLEN%>n K ; ! ááigân! DIFTONGISATION 
+Sg+Loc:^WG^RLEN%>st K ;             ! ääigist 
+Sg+Com:^WG^CLEN^SVLOW%>in K ;       ! aigijn  e ij i jn  č:i ^RC:j 
+Sg+Abe:^WG^RVSH%>ttáá K ;           ! äigittáá 
+Ess:^CLEN%>n K ;                    ! äigin  eeč^RCi 
+Par:^CLEN%>d K ;                    ! äigid 
 
 
 
  
 
!LEXICON S_SPAALVAS !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
!S_ALGAAS_PX ;                      ! XXX check, add -i? 
!+N+Sg+Nom:š^WG^RLEN K ; ! spáálváš 
!+N+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:âš^WG^RLEN K ; ! spáálvâš 
!+N+Cmp/SgNom:âš^WG^RVSH%> Rhash ; 
!+N+Cmp/SgGen:^SV^SLEN%> Rhash ; 
!+N+Cmp/PlGen:%>i Rhash ; 
!+N+Sg+Gen:^SV^SLEN K ;            ! spálváá 
!+N+Sg+Acc:^SV^SLEN K ;            ! spálváá 
!+N+Sg+Ill:ž^RVSH%>ân K ;          ! spálvážân 
!+N+Sg+Ill+Use/NG:ž^RLEN%>ân K ;   ! spáálvážân 
!+N+Sg+Loc:^SV^SLEN%>st K ;        ! spálváást 
!+N+Sg+Com:%>in K ;                ! spálváin 
!+N+Sg+Abe:^SV^SLEN%>ttáá K ;      ! spálvááttáá 
!+N+Ess:ž^WG%>in K ;               ! spálvážin 
!+N+Ess+Use/NG:ž^WG^RLEN%>in K ;   ! spálvážin 
!+N+Par:ž^WG%>id K ;               ! spálvážid 
!+N+Par+Use/NG:^WG^RLEN%>žid K ;   ! spálvážid 
!+N: X_SVSLENh_PL ; 

 

!! ### 2KYELI - 2SYEJI lexicon family 
!! ne pitää yhdistää, yksi ero: 
!! X-leksikossa Sg Ill erilainen 
 
LEXICON 2KYELI  !!≈ * **@CODE@** i-e-á, similar to 2ALGE, except from -i some places.     
2KYELI_SG ; 
2KYELI_PL ; 
 
LEXICON 2KYELI_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@**  kyeli nouns 
+N: KYELI_SYEJI_SG ; ! common kyeli-syeji-sg 
    2_KYELI_SYEJI_SG_PX ; ! common px 
 
LEXICON KYELI_SYEJI_SG  !!≈ * **@CODE@** i-e-á,     
+Sg+Nom: K ;                 ! kyeli 
+Sg+Gen:e^WG^RVSH K ;        ! kyele 
+Sg+Acc:e^WG^RVSH K ;        ! kyele 
+Sg+Ill:^EA^CSH^RLEN%>n K ;  ! kuálán 
+Sg+Loc:e^WG%>est K ;        ! kyeleest 
+Sg+Com:^WG%>in K ;          ! kuolijn, peelijn   <PP px deiki       ??? 
+Sg+Abe:e^WG^RVSH%>ttáá K ;  ! kyelettáá 
+Ess:^CLEN%>n K ;            ! kyellin 
+Par:^CLEN%>d K ;            ! kyellid 
+Cmp/SgNom:^RVSH%> Rhash ; 
+Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:%> Rhash ; !kääniores 
+Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:e^WG^RVSH%> Rhash ; ! pelemuddoost kyelesaallâs Err/Orth? 
+Cmp/SgGen:e^WG^RVSH%> Rhash ; ! 
 
LEXICON 2_KYELI_SYEJI_SG_PX !!≈ * **@CODE@**  common kyeli-syeji px 
+N+Cmp/SgNom:^RVSH%> Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:%> Rhash ; !kääniores 
+N+Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:e^WG^RVSH%> Rhash ; ! pelemuddoost kyelesaallâs Err/Orth? 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:e^WG^RVSH%> Rhash ;    ! 
+N+Sg+Nom:^EA^CLEN VPXsuff12nom ;   ! kuállám       
+N+Sg+Nom:^CLEN VPXsuff3 ;          !
+N+Sg+Gen:^EA^CLEN VPXsuff12 ;      ! XXX check       
+N+Sg+Acc:^EA^CLEN VPXsuff12 ;      ! XXX check       
+N+Sg+Gen:e^WG VPXsuff3 ;           ! syejes (was: syejees, now -e-) 
+N+Sg+Acc:e^WG VPXsuff3 ;           ! syejes
+N+Sg+Ill:^EA%>s CPXsuff ;          ! suájásis ill páikkásis 
+N+Sg+Loc:e^WG^RVSH%>st CPXsuff ;   ! kyelestis 
+N+Sg+Com:^WG^RVSH%>in CPXsuff ;    ! kuolijnân     
+N:%> Nom_DER ; 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2KYELI_SG_DIM ; 
+N+Der1+Der/lasj:^EA^WG%>l ANOLASJ ; 
+N+Der1+Der2+Der/Car:e^WG^RVSH%>tt MUSTOTTEM ; 
+N+Ess:^CSH%>n CPXsuff ;     ! kyelinis           
 
LEXICON X_KYELI  !!≈ * **@CODE@** lexicon coming in from the adjectives             
KYELI_SYEJI_SG ; 
X_KYELI_PL ; 
 
LEXICON X_KYELI_PL  !!≈ * **@CODE@** i-e-á, similar to 2ALGE, except from -i some places. 
+Pl+Ill:^WG%>id K ;  ! kuolijd 
KYELI_SYEJI_PL ; 
 
LEXICON 2KYELI_PL!!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_KYELI_PL ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:^WG^RVSH%>i Rhash ; 
!+N+Pl+Loc:^WG%>in CPXsuff ;              ! This overgenerates "*paanijdis" -PM                     
2_KYELI_SYEJI_PL_PX ; 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2KYELI_PL_DIM ; 

 
LEXICON 2_KYELI_SYEJI_PL_PX  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N+Pl+Gen:^WG^RVSH%>id CPXsuff ;  ! kuolijdis     
+N+Pl+Acc:^WG^RVSH%>id CPXsuff ;  ! kuolijdis     
+N+Pl+Ill:^WG^RVSH%>id CPXsuff ;  !      
+N+Pl+Loc:^WG^RVSH%>in CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Com:^WG^RVSH%>id CPXsuffCOM ;  ! 
 
 
LEXICON KYELI_SYEJI_PL  !!≈ * **@CODE@** i-e-á,     
+Pl+Nom:e^WG^RVSH%>h K ;        ! kyeleh        
+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:^WG^RVSH%>i K ;  ! kuolij        
+Pl+Gen:^WG%>i K ;! kuolij        
+Pl+Acc:^WG%>id K ;             ! kuolijd       
+Pl+Loc:^WG%>in K ;             ! kuolijn       
+Pl+Com:^WG^RVSH%>i GUIN ;      ! kuolijguin    
+Pl+Abe:^WG^RVSH%>ittáá K ;     ! kuolijttáá    
 
 
 
!! ### 2KIRKKO - 2NJAMMA lexicon family 
 
LEXICON 2KIRKKO  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  > KIRKKO_NJAMMA, but WG for Sg+Loc: 
2KIRKKO_SG ; 
KIRKKO_NJAMMA_SG ; 
KIRKKO_NJAMMA_PL ; 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2KIRKKO_DIM ; !kieđâš 
 
 
LEXICON 2KIRKKO_SG!!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N+Sg+Loc:^SV^WG^SLEN%>st K ;   !kirhoost 
KIRKKO_NJAMMA_SG ; 
 
LEXICON 2NJAMMA   !!≈ * **@CODE@** njamma > KIRKKO_NJAMMA, but WG CLEN for Sg+Loc: loho:lovvoost 
+N+Sg+Loc:^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN%>st K ;         
KIRKKO_NJAMMA_SG ; 
KIRKKO_NJAMMA_PL ; 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2KISSA_DIM ; !kieđâš 
 
