src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx !!≈ * **@CODE@** here we put all normal nouns, as before
nolppo+Sem/Ani:no^RVlppo 2NJAMMA "nulppo" ;
äijihtävgi+Sem/Dummytag:äijih#tä^RVvgi 2AIGI "" ;
päniuážži+Sem/Dummytag:päni#uážži 2AIGI "" ;
njeeri+Sem/Dummytag:njeer^RCi3 2KYELI "" ;
lahtâsyeinih+Sem/Dummytag:lahtâ#syei4ni 2AIGI_PL "" ;
kandipargo+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Dummytag:kandi#pa^RVrgo 2KIRKKO "" ;
uásiäigipargo+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Dummytag:uásiäigi#pa^RVrgo 2KIRKKO "" ;
oppâčáituspargo+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Dummytag:oppâčáitus#pa^RVrgo 2KIRKKO "" ;
tijmepeeli+Sem/Measr_Time:tijme#peel^RCi3 2KYELI "puoli tuntia" ;
siäivumsyeji+Sem/Dummytag:siäivum#syej^RCi3 2KYELI "oikeussuoja" ;
mielkkirahka+Sem/Food:mielkki#ra^RVhka 2NJAMMA "maitorahka" ;
pargottesvuođâäigi+Sem/Dummytag:pargottes#vuođâ#ä^RVi4gi 2AIGI "työttömyysaika" ;
pilkko+Sem/Dummytag:pi^RVlkk4o 2KIRKKO "pilkka" ;
aheluokka+Sem/Dummytag:ahe#luokka 2NJAMMA "ikäluokka" ;
tutka+Sem/Dummytag:tu^RVtka 2NJAMMA "tutka" ;
teeli+v2+Sem/Dummytag:teel^RCi3 2KYELI "tela" ;
lođâstähti+Sem/Dummytag:lođâs#tä^RVht^RCi 2AIGI "nikama" ;
dogma+Sem/Dummytag:do^RVgma 2NJAMMA "dogma" ;
plasma+Sem/Dummytag:pla^RVsma 2NJAMMA "plasma" ;
lahna+Sem/Dummytag:la^RVhna 2NJAMMA "lahna" ;
kilbo+Sem/Dummytag:ki^RVlbo 2KIRKKO "kilpa" ;
ruttâmeeri+Sem/Dummytag:ruttâ#meer^RCi3 2KYELI "rahamäärä" ;
tundra+Sem/Dummytag:tu^RVndra 2NJAMMA "tundra" ;
sitra+Sem/Dummytag:si^RVtra 2NJAMMA "sitra" ;
kavra+Sem/Plant:ka^RVvra 2NJAMMA "kaura" ;
siähálâsvyevdi+Sem/Plc:siähálâs#vyevdi 2AIGI "sekametsä" ;
kužžâeeti+Sem/State:kužžâ#eet^RCi3 2KYELI "kusihätä" ;
fakta+Sem/Dummytag:fa^RVkta 2NJAMMA "fakta" ;
pasta+Sem/Food:pa^RVsta 2NJAMMA "pasta" ;
peljiräigi+Sem/Dummytag:pelji#rä^RVi4gi 2AIGI "korvakäytävä" ;
kuđjo+Sem/Dummytag:ku^RVđjo 2KIRKKO "suojapeite" ;
seevi+Sem/Dummytag:seev^RCi3 2KYELI "hanki" ;
sivlo+Sem/Dummytag:si^RVvlo 2NJAMMA "naskali" ;
mielkkiryebbi+Sem/Dummytag:mielkki#ryebbi 2AIGI "maitorupi" ;
tullâvääri+v2+Sem/Dummytag:tullâ#väär^RCi3 2KYELI "tulivuori" ;
tobdočuárvi+Sem/Dummytag:tobdo#čuárvi 2AIGI "tuntosarvi" ;
čulkko+Sem/Dummytag:ču^RVlkk4o 2KIRKKO "kulppo" ;
nuorâkerdi+Sem/Dummytag:nuorâ#ke^RVrdi 2AIGI "nuoriso" ;
lasepargo+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Dummytag:lase#pa^RVrgo 2KIRKKO "lisätyö" ;
paijeelääigipargo+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Dummytag:pai4jeel#ääigi#pa^RVrgo 2KIRKKO "ylityö" ;
omâstyeji+Sem/Dummytag:omâs#tyej^RCi3 2KYELI "puukäsityö" ;
lahâasâttempargo+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Dummytag:lahâ#asâttem#pa^RVrgo 2KIRKKO "lainsäädäntötyö" ;
ovdedemohtsâšpargo+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Dummytag:ovdedem#ohtsâš#pa^RVrgo 2KIRKKO "kehitysyhteistyö" ;
aalmugtiervâsvuođâpargo+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Dummytag:aalmug#tiervâs#vuođâ#pa^RVrgo 2KIRKKO "kansanterveystyö" ;
skiältturyevdih+Sem/Dummytag:skiälttu#ryevdi 2AIGI_PL "ansaraudat" ;
päniryevdih+Sem/Dummytag:päni#ryevdi 2AIGI_PL "hammasraudat" ;
čuárbbeltäävtih+Sem/Dummytag:čuárbbel#tä^RVht^RCi 2AIGI_PL "lannenikamat" ;
áimuvyeimih+Sem/Dummytag:áimu#vyei4mi 2AIGI_PL "ilmavoimat" ;
kietâvyeimih+Sem/Dummytag:kietâ#vyei4mi 2AIGI_PL "käsivoimat" ;
piäluštâsvyeimih+Sem/Dummytag:piäluštâs#vyei4mi 2AIGI_PL "puolustusvoimat" ;
staatâpeeivih+Sem/Dummytag:staatâ#pe^RVi4vi 2AIGI_PL "valtiopäivät" ;
njälmiryevdih+Sem/Dummytag:njälmi#ryevdi 2AIGI_PL "kuolaimet" ;
puksâluágih+Sem/Dummytag:puksâ#luággi 2AIGI_PL "vanhat ja kuluneet housut" ;
kuákki+Sem/Dummytag:kuákk4i 2AIGI "koukku" ;
kieggi+Sem/Dummytag:kieggi 2AIGI ;
lyepi+Sem/Dummytag:lyep^RCi3 2KYELI ;
syejikäävnih+Sem/Dummytag:syeji#kä^RVvni 2AIGI_PL ;
käähvih+Sem/Dummytag:kä^RVhvi 2AIGI_PL ;
asto+Sem/Dummytag:a^RVsto 2KIRKKO ;
ipto+Sem/Dummytag:i^RVpto 2NJAMMA "" ;
argâpeivi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Time:argâ#pe^RVi4vi 2AIGI "" ;	 ! tags_via_apertium
ihepeeli+Sem/Time:ihe#peel^RCi3 2KYELI "puoli vuotta" ;
kalvâhuášši+Sem/Plant:kalvâ#huášši 2AIGI "peltokorte" ; ! tags_via_apertium
kirkko+Sem/Build_Org:ki^RVrkk4o 2KIRKKO "kirkko" ;	! YAML  tags_via_apertium
källeekäiski+Sem/Plant:källee#kä^RVi4ski 2AIGI "kallioimarre" ;
kääni+v2+Sem/Ani-bird:kään^RCi3 2KYELI "kana" ;	! tags_via_apertium
kyelimääli+v2+Sem/Food:kyeli#määl^RCi3 2KYELI "kalakeitto" ;
njamma+Sem/Body:nja^RVmma 2NJAMMA ;	! YAML ¢njammain, njammaast, njaaman, njama tags_via_apertium
peeli+Sem/Part:peel^RCi3 2KYELI "puoli" ;	! YAML tags_via_apertium
päikkipargo+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Act:päikki#pa^RVrgo 2KIRKKO "kotitehtävä" ; ! tags_via_apertium
ruottâpeivi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Time:ruottâ#pe^RVi4vi 2AIGI "" ;
pyeri+Sem/Semcon:pyer^RCi3 2KYELI "hyve" ; ! tags_via_apertium
vielgistäsni+Sem/Plant:vielgis#tä^RVsni 2AIGI "valkovuokko" ;
